ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_CH/1996/hyph_de_CH.dic
ug3s1ti
ug1he
u2gh
uge1sa
u1ge
uges2
ug1li
u1ü
u1k1r
ukon3
u1ko
u1kn2
u1ke
u1klö
u1ku
2ut
ut1ar
ut1ac
utau3
u1tr
ut1ro
u1to
uto2c
ut3sche
u2ts
ut1sc
ut2s2chl
ut1sp2
u2tent
u1te
u3ten
u1tu
utz1w
u2m1ak
u1ma
um1s2t
u1mä
1um1ga
um1g
u1mü
uve3rä
u1v
uve2
uver1
u1w
u1pa
u1pr
up1re
u1po
u1pi
upi1e
u1ph
u1pe
u1pl
up4ti
u2pt
up4t2e.
up1te
u1pfl
u1z1we
uf1ar
u1fa
u3fan
uf1ro
uf1re
uf1rä
uf1ru
uf1rü
uf1op
u1fo
u3fe2n.
u1fe
uf1ent
u2f1ei
uf1l
uf1fr
u1xe
2g.
1ga
g2a1ri1
2gar1b
2g1a2n.
ga2n1s
ga1be
ga3bu
ga1la
2gau
ga1th
g2rad
gros2
g1rid
g1r2ig
1gr2if
1gren
g1reic
greu1
1grä
1gru
1grü
1go
go1ra
go1ri
gori3en
g2o1i
3goisti2s2ch.
gois1ti
goisti1sc
go1c
g1n
1gnie
g2n1s
g2nü
1gi
gi1r
gi1en
gi1ta
g2s
g2s1ar
gs1an
gs1a1b
g3sal
gs1au
gs1ak
gs1ap
g1s1o
g1s1i
gsin1
gs1s
2g3sc
gs3h
g1s1e
g1s1ä
g1s1u
gs1k
gs1tr
gs3tei
gs1te
g3s2tel
g1s1tü
g3s1tö
gs1p2
gspro1
g3s2pi
2gh
g1ha
g1ho
g1hä
g1hü
gh3te
g2ht
1ge
ge2an
ge1ra
ge1ro
ger2s3te
gers2
ge1rä
ge3ru
ge1nau
ge1no
ge1ni
gen1sp2
ge2ns
gen1k
ge1ir
2g1ein
ges2
2ges1r
ges3s
ge3sc
ge1st
ge2s3ter
ges1te
ge1e2
ge3d
ge1le
gel2d3er
gel1de
ge1ur
ge1gl
gek2
2g1b
1gä
2g1ärm
gäs3
2gd
g1da
g1lis
g2lie
1gliz
g1leb
1glä
2glän
glä2s1c
g1lu
1glü
1gu
gu1a
gu1ra
gu2e
2g1g
gge1b2
g1ge
1gü
g1k
2gt
g1ta
g1tr
gt1h
g1tä
g1tu
g1tü
2g1m
2g1w
2g1p
g1z
2g1f
1gö
gö1r
ü1ro
ü1ri
ürch4t2e.
ürc2ht
ürch1te
ü1re
ü2r1ei2
ür1k
ün1a
ü2n2s
ün3sche
ün1sc
ün3str
ü2nes
ü1ne
ün1t
ünf1
ü1sa
ü2sc
ü2st
üs3te
üs1tu
ü1che
ü2ch1l
ü1cki
üc2k
ü2ckers2
ü1cke
üh1ri
üh1re
ü2h1s
ü1he
ühe2m
üh1li
üh1le
ü1hu
1üb1r
ü2b1s
übe2
üb2er1
üb1l
ü2bu
üd1a2
üd1o
üd1it
ü1di
ü2d1s
ü3de
ü1le
ül1ei
ü1lu
üg3sa
üg2s
üge2l
ü1ge
üge1l1e
üg1l
ü1k
ü2ters2
ü1te
ü1tu
ü3mi
ü3me
üf1s
1ka
2k2a1ri
2kar1b
k1arbe
ka1na
ka1no
k1a2ns
ka1in
ka2s3t
ka1b
ka1d
ka1la
ka3le
k1au2s1g
k1auf1g
2kak
ka1th
kat2t
kamp2
1kr
2k1rad
kraf4
k1roh
kro1bi3
k1rot
2krip
k1reic
kre1i1e
2k1rec
1ko
ko1a
ko1ra
ko1ri
ko3ru
2koo
kono2me
ko1no
ko1n2om
ko2n1s
kons3t
ko2s
ko1pe
kn2
kna1be
kn1ab
kno1c
1knü
1knö
1ki.
1ki1o
ki2n1s1
1kind
kindust3
kin1du
kindus1
ki1er.
ki1ers2
ki2d
k1sa
ks1s
k1su1
ks2t
k1sto
ks3tis
ks1ti
k1stu
ks1pa
ksp2
k1spo
k1spe
k2sö
k1c
k1h
khau2
ke1ra
k1ero
k1er1st
kers2
ken1a
ken1st
ke2ns
ke1c
ke2bu2
keu2
k1b
kbibli3
k1bi
kbi1b
kbib1l
1kä
kär2
k1d
k1len
k1leit
k1leu
1klä
k1lüc
ku1ra
ku3s2c
ku1c
2k1uh1
1kul
k1g
1kü
kü1c
2k1üb
k1k
kt1ar
kt1an
kta1b
kt1ad
kt1au
k1tat
k1t1r
k1to
kt1in
k1ti
kt1s2t
k2ts
kt1er1g
k1te
k4tent
k3ten
kt1ein
k1tä
k1tu
k1tür
kt1üb
kt1t
k1m
k1w
kwo1
kwün3
k1p
kpro1
k1z
k1f
1kö
kö1c
k1ö2k
1ky
2t.
1t2a.
t1arz
1ta2n.
1tan2c
t1an1w
1tan2z.
1tai2
ta1in
t2a3se
1tas1t
ta1c2k
2ta2b1s
ta1be
ta2bend
1tab1l
ta1di1
1tal3la
1tal1li
1talg
1taus
2tau2s.
t1aus1d
tau2bes
t2aub
tau1be
tau1f2l
3tag
ta2g1a
t1a3go
1ta1me
t1af1r
t1rant
1trai
tras2s
1t1ral
3tr2aue2
1trag
1trak
t1ra1to
t1ra1ti
t1r2a1v
1tr2on
1troc
2t1rol1li
tr2ol
3trollie1re
t1ro1v
3tropf
t1rinn
1tris
t1rier
t1rien
tri3e2n.
t1rieg
t2rib
t1r2ig
t2r2it
tri1zi1
t1riz
t1reis
2trec
t1rech
t1re1d
t1reg
1t2ret
2t1re1z
1t2reff
3t2räg
1t1ru1a
1t1ru1i
1trum
trü1be2
1t2o.
1tor.
to1ra
to1r1re
to1ri
tori3en
1to1re
t1or1g
2tort
1ton
ton1st1
to2ns
1t2oi
to1in
to1str
1tob
to1be
1to1d
1tou
to1un
1tok
1tot
to1t1r
1t2ow
1to1j
t1n
tnä1
1ti
ti1ra
3ti2n.
ti1no
3ti1ne
2tind
ti1nu
2tic
ti1en
ti1ell
2tieg
tie2f3er
tie1fe
ti2lu
3tilg
3tig
tik1ar
ti1ka
3tit
ti1ta
ti1th
2tim
ti2mes
ti1me
2ts
t2s1ar
ts1an
ts1ab
ts1au
tsa2ge
t3sag
ts1ap
t2so
ts1or
tsinst2
t1si
t2s1i2ns
t2s1int
ts1id
ts1s
tse2r1
t1se
ts1er1k
ts1eng
ts1ent
t2s1ex
ts1un
t1su
ts1k
ts2t
ts3tab
ts3taf
ts3tri
t1sto
ts3th
t1s2teu
ts1te
t1stu
ts3part
tsp2
t1span
t1spra
ts1po
ts2pä
t1sy
t1c
t1ha
t2har
1t2hag
1thr
1thon
t1ho1b
th1n
2thil
1theo1
t1hei
theis3
t1heb
t1hel
1them
t1hef
th1l
t1hu
th3m
t1hö
1te
3t2e.
te3ar
te1au
3ter.
te1ral
teri3en
te1ri
ter3sta
ters2
te2r3ei
te1re
te2r1emp
ter1k
ter3mas4
ter1ma
terma3ss
3ten
ten2ab
te1no
ten1sp2
te2ns
ten1ei
te1ne
ten1u
ten1g
ten1k
2t1ent1w
t1ent1f
ten3ma3s2
ten1m
ten1ma
te1i2n1h
2teis
3tei1lu
2teig
4tess
te1s1h
te1s2ka
tes1ta
2tes1m
2tec2k
2teh
4te1hä
2teb
3te2l.
3teln
3te2ls
3telg
te1g1r
tegi2e
te1gi
3te2t.
3tem3stö
tems2t
2temp
te1ph
tezei4
te1z
te1ze
t1b
tbe1s
tbu2s1
t1bu
1t1bö
tä2t2s1
t1d
t1l
tli1ef
1tu1a
tu1ral
1tuo
2tund
1tung
tu1i
3tus
tu1cho
1tu1e
1tug
1tu2m.
tum1s2p2
t1g
tge1s2
t1ge
tge3le
tür1c
3tüch
tüh1
t1k2
tkon2t3r
t1ko
t1ta
t1trä
t3to
t3ti
tti2s
tt1sta
t2ts
tts2t
tt1str
tt1ho
tte3nst
t1te
t3ten
tte2ns
tt1e2if
t1tä
t1tu
tt1üb
t1m
t3ma1s2
t1ma
t1w
twa2
t1p2
tpro1
tza2
tz3erkl
t1ze
tzer1k
t1zwec
tz1wu
t1f
1tön
t1ö2k
1ty
2m.
1ma
mar1s2
2m1ar1b
ma1nac
mani3er.
ma1ni
2m1a2n2s
4mank
3mas
mach1a
3mal
mal1a
ma1l1au
4malit
ma1li
m1a3go
ma1g1n
magi3er
ma1gi
ma2g2e.
ma1ge
2mak
mak1ti2
ma2ta
ma2t1o
ma2t1s
ma1th
2mat1k2
2ma1mi
m1r
1mo
3mor
mo1ra
mo1ri
mo2ns1
mo3ne
mo2ses
mo1se
mo1sp2
3moh
3mo1d
mo1k1l
m1n
1mi
min1du1
mindust3
mindus1
mi1se1
mi2s3t
mi1sp2
mi1erm
mie1i2
mi1g1r
mit1a
mi2t3s
mit1er
mi1te
mi2t1u
4mitz
m2s1au2f
m2s1am
m2s1or
m1so
m2s1äm
m1sä
ms2t
m1s1ti
m1stu
ms2p2
m1c
m1h
mhau4
1me
3mer.
me1ras2
me1ra4d
me1ro
me2rin
me1ri
mer1zi1
me1no
me1n1ig
men4schw
me2ns
men1sc
2m1ent1sp2
men2ts
me1ch
me1en
3me1d
me1di1
me1t1r
me2tri
me1ti2
me1th
me1p
me1x
m1b
mbi1e
m1bi
mbe1ra
mb2er
mbe1s
3mäs
m1da
m1dr2
m1do
m1l
mlin4
1mu
3mun
mu1na
mu1ni
3mus
mu1se1
mus3k
mu1e
m1g
2m1üb
3müt
mü4te
m1k
mt1ar
m1trä
mt1ru
m1to
mti2s
m1ti
mt2s1e
m2ts
mts1p2
mt1z
mma2g
m1ma
mm1sta
mms2t
mm1ta
m1w
m1pa
m1pr
m1po
m1pi
m1phe
m1pe
m1pl
m1p1la
mpf1l
m1pö
m1z
m1f
1mö
my1t2
1v
2v.
va1k
va2ta
va2t1r
va2tin
va1ti
va2t1s
v1r
vor1
vo3ra2n.
vo3rang
vo2re
vo2n1
vo2gl
vo1g
vi3o
vi1en
vi1et
vi1t
2vs
v1sta
ve2
ve3ar
ver1
ve1re2
ve3r2e.
ver3b
ve3ni
ve3ne
ve3nu
v1ent1w
ve3h
ve3li3
2v1b
2v1k
v1ko2
2vt
v1to
2v1m
2v1w
2w.
war3s1te
wars2
wa2ru
wang2s1
1was
1wah
wah2re2s
wah1re
wa1b
wa3ge
1wat
wo2r1a
wor3i
wo2rei
wo1re
wo1r1u
wo1che2
1woh
wo1hi
woh2l
wo1b
wol1l4e
w2ol
1wid
wi1th
2ws1
w1sk
1wer1du
wer2ta
wer2t1r
we1ni
wei3s2se
wei3sc
1wei1se
wei1br
1weil
west1a
1weh
we2ba
web1au
we2br
we2b1s
we1le
welt1r
wel2ter
wel1te
wel2tu
1weg
we2g1r
weg3l
1wäs
wä3sc
1wäl
w1d
wu2n2s
wu2s
1wuc
1wüh
2wt
2w1w
wö1c
1w1j
2wje2t.
2p.
1paa
pa1no
pa1la
pau3
pa3gh
1pak
pa1th
pa1pr
prac2ht3
1prak
1prob
1pro1d
1pr2o1z
1pro1j
p3r2ig
p1rik
3pres
1p2räg
pru3ch2t.
pruc2ht
1prüf
po1ra
2porn
por1s2
porta3b
por1ta
p1ob
po1ly
p2ol
po1g1
p2ow1
p1n
pi2as
pi1a
pi1ra
pi1ent
pi1ta
pita4lie
pita1li
p1sta
p1sp2
1psy
p1c
2ph.
1pho
1phi
phi1en
1p2e.
1pe2a2
pe1ra
1pers2
per1st
peo1
pen1s1z
pe2ns
pen1t
pech1
1pel
pe1l1a
pe1l1e
pe1zi1
pe1z
p1b
pbe1
p1d
pda2
p1da4t
1pla
p2lan
1p1li2n.
1pli1ni
1pli2ne
1p2liz
1plä
1plü
1pu
3pun
pu2s3
pu1b1
p1k
2pt
pt1ar
pt1au
pt1ro
p1to
p3ti
p2t1in
p2t1s
p1tä
p1tu
pt1t
pt1z
p1m
p1ma1
p1pa
p1po
p1pi
pp1h
p1pe
p1z
pf1ri
pf1sa1
p2fei
p1fe
pfeh4l2e.
pfeh1le
p2fü
1py1
2z.
1zan1
za1ch
1zah
z1ab
z1ad
1zau
z1aus
z1at
z1am
1zap
z1r
1zo
zo2o
zo1c
z1n
1zi
zi3on2
zi1o
zi1en
zi1es
zi2ga
zi1ta
z1s2
z3sa
z1su1
z1c
z1h
zhau2
1ze
zer1ob
zer1k
ze1na
ze1no
ze1ni
2ze1ne
2z1en1ge
zen1t1r
2z1ent1w
1zen2ze
ze2l1a
2zele
2z1ef
z1b
zbi2o
z1bi
1zä
2z1äm
z1d
z1l
zlie2
1zu
zu1a
zu1na
zu1ni
zu1nä
zu3s2
zu1b
zu1l
zu1gl
zu1k
z2u1t
z1u2m.
zu1z
zu1f2
z1g
1zü
zür1c
2z1üb
z1k
2zt
z1ta
z1ti2
zt1h
z4t1end
z1te
z3ten
z1tä
z1tu
z1tü
z1m
1zwan
z1wal
z1wo
zwor2
z1wel
z1p2
zpunk4
z1pu
z3pun
2zz
z1za
z1f
1zö1
2zöl
1zy1
1fa
f1an1zu
f2a1se2
fa1b
fa2b1l
f1rar
f1ra1s
fr2o2n
fro2s
f1ric
frei3s
frö3s
1fo
fo1ru
fo2na
f1n
1fi
fi1en
fi2lei
fi1le
fi1ta1
fit1r
fs1all
fs1au
fs1ak
f2s1o
fs1s
f2s1er
f1se
f2s1ei
fsek1
f2su
fs1un
fs1k
fs2t
f1sta
f1str
f1sto
f1s1ti
fs3tät
f1stä
f1spa
fsp2
fs1pre
f1spe
f1s2pu
f1c
f1h
fhor1
1fe
fe1ra
fer1st
fers2
f1er1l
fer1ma1
f1er1w
fe1na
fe1em
fe2l
fel1st
fe2ls
fel1tr
fet4t3er
fet1te
f1ex
f1b
1fä
fä1c
f1d
2flic
f2lu
1fu
3fug
2fum
f1g
fge1s2
f1ge
1fü
fü3s2s2e.
füs1se
f1üb
f1k
f1ta
ft1auf
f1tr
ft1ro
ft1rö
f1to
ft2s1i
f2ts
ft2s1e
ft2su
ft1str
fts2t
fts1p2
f2t1ent
f1te
f3ten
f1tu
f1tü
ft1t
f1m
f1w
f1p
f1z2
fzen2
f1ze
f3zt
fz4te
ff1l
1fé
ö1ri
ö1re
ö1r4er
ö1ru
ör3te
ö1ni
ö1nu
ös1a
ö2sc
ö3schu
öh1re
öh1nu
ö1he
öh1l
ö1hu
ö1e
ö1be
ög1l
ö2k
ö3ke
ö1tu
ö1w
öp2fes
öp1fe
öpf1l
öf1l
1j
ja1n
ja2me
jo1a1
jo1ri
jo2s
je2a
je1n
jes1t
jeg1
je2t1r
je1t1u
ju1ni
jub2
jugen2
ju1ge
2jö
1ya
y1r
y1on
y1na
y1n1o
yn1d
y1nu1
yn1t
y1sa1
y1s1h
ys3t
y1sp2
y1c
y1h
y1e
ye1ri4
yerisch3er
yeri3sche
yeri1sc
yerisch3en
y1b
yb1r
y1d
y1lo
y1le
y1g
y1k
yk1l
yt2
y1ta
yp1r
y1po
y1pi
y1ph
y1pe
y1z
y1f
1q
qu2
que3r2e.
qu1er
que1re
x1a
xan1
x1or
x1o1d
1x1n
1xi1o
xis1
3xistie1re2n.
xis1ti
xistie1re
xistiere2n
3xistier2t.
xi1en
1xi1b
1xik
1xit
1xi1v
x1s
1x2e.
1xer
1xen
1xes
x1b
x1d
1xu
xu1a
xu1e
x1g
x1k
x1t1r
x1t1o
xt1s2t
x2ts
x1tu
x1m
x1p
x1z
ß1s
ß1b
ß2l
ß1g
ß1t
ß2m
ß1f
